California, session 20252026, AB1630.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3570.1 is added to the Government Code, to read:3570.1. (a) An exclusive representative may, in their discretion, invite one or more members of a bargaining unit to remotely and passively observe a session held for the purpose of a meet and confer on a memorandum of understanding. At the request of the exclusive representative, remote access shall be provided for this purpose. A remote observer may not delay or disrupt a meet and confer session.(b) Absent an agreement of the parties, a member of a bargaining unit observing a session pursuant to this section shall not receive released or reassigned time or compensation to observe a session.(c) Nothing in this section shall prevent the parties from agreeing to allow in-person observers or greater participation by observers in sessions held for the purpose of a meet and confer. Nothing in this section shall require any change in existing practices that allow in-person observers or greater participation by observers in sessions held for the purpose of a meet and confer.